Tennessee, session 114, HB1974.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) If an order of protection is issued pursuant to title 36, chapter 3, part 6, to
protect a student who is enrolled in a public school in this state from another student
who is enrolled in the same public school, then the principal of the school in which both
students are enrolled shall remove the student who is named as the respondent in the
order of protection from any classroom or school-sponsored event or activity shared with
the student who is named as the petitioner in the order of protection.
(b) The school or school district shall provide the student who is named as the
respondent in the order of protection with alternative instruction for any class or course
from which the student is removed for purposes of this section. This section only
requires a student's removal from a classroom or school-sponsored event or activity for
the period of time for which an order of protection is in effect.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to orders of protection entered on or after such date.
HB1974
009577
- 1 -